tests/июль.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах июль":
    июль<n><nom> :  июль 
    июль<n><gen> :  июлӗн 
    июль<n><dat> :  июле 
    июль<n><loc> :  июльте
    июль<n><abl> :  июльтен
    июль<n><ins> :  июльпе 
    июль<n><abe> :  июльсӗр 
    июль<n><ben> :  июльшӗн
    июль<n><px1sg><nom> :  июлӗм 
    июль<n><px1sg><gen> :  июлӗмӗн 
    июль<n><px1sg><dat> :  июлӗме 
    июль<n><px1sg><loc> :  июлӗмре 
    июль<n><px1sg><abl> :  июлӗмрен 
    июль<n><px1sg><ins> :  июлӗмпе 
    июль<n><px1sg><abe> :  июлӗмсӗр 
    июль<n><px1sg><ben> :  июлӗмшӗн
    июль<n><px2sg><nom> :  июлӳ 
    июль<n><px2sg><gen> :  июлӳн 
    июль<n><px2sg><dat> :  июльне
    июль<n><px2sg><loc> :  июлӳнте 
    июль<n><px2sg><abl> :  июлӳнтен 
    июль<n><px2sg><ins> :  июлӳпе 
    июль<n><px2sg><abe> :  июлӳсӗр 
    июль<n><px2sg><ben> :  июлӳшӗн
    июль<n><px3sp><nom> :  июлӗ 
    июль<n><px3sp><gen> :  июлӗн 
    июль<n><px3sp><dat> :  июльне 
    июль<n><px3sp><loc> :  июлӗнче 
    июль<n><px3sp><abl> :  июлӗнчен 
    июль<n><px3sp><ins> :  июлӗпе 
    июль<n><px3sp><abe> :  июлӗсӗр 
    июль<n><px3sp><ben> :  июлӗшӗн
    июль<n><px1pl><nom> :  июлӗмӗр 
    июль<n><px1pl><gen> :  июлӗмӗрӗн 
    июль<n><px1pl><dat> :  июлӗмӗре 
    июль<n><px1pl><loc> :  июлӗмӗрте 
    июль<n><px1pl><abl> :  июлӗмӗртен 
    июль<n><px1pl><ins> :  июлӗмӗрпе 
    июль<n><px1pl><abe> :  июлӗмӗрсӗр 
    июль<n><px1pl><ben> :  июлӗмӗршӗн
    июль<n><px2pl><nom> :  июлӗр 
    июль<n><px2pl><gen> :  июлӗрӗн 
    июль<n><px2pl><dat> :  июлӗре 
    июль<n><px2pl><loc> :  июлӗрте 
    июль<n><px2pl><abl> :  июлӗртен 
    июль<n><px2pl><ins> :  июлӗрпе 
    июль<n><px2pl><abe> :  июлӗрсӗр 
    июль<n><px2pl><ben> :  июлӗршӗн
    июль<n><pl><nom> :  июльсем 
    июль<n><pl><gen> :  июльсен 
    июль<n><pl><dat> :  июльсене 
    июль<n><pl><loc> :  июльсенче 
    июль<n><pl><abl> :  июльсенчен 
    июль<n><pl><ins> :  июльсемпе 
    июль<n><pl><abe> :  июльсемсӗр 
    июль<n><pl><ben> :  июльсемшӗн
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  июлӗмсем 
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  июлӗмсен 
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  июлӗмсене 
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  июлӗмсенче 
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  июлӗмсенчен 
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  июлӗмсемпе 
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  июлӗмсемсӗр 
    июль<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  июлӗмсемшӗн
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  июлӳсем 
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  июлӳсен 
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  июлӳсене 
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  июлӳсенче 
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  июлӳсенчен 
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  июлӳсемпе 
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  июлӳсемсӗр 
    июль<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  июлӳсемшӗн
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  июлӗсем 
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  июлӗсен 
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  июлӗсене 
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  июлӗсенче 
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  июлӗсенчен 
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  июлӗсемпе 
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  июлӗсемсӗр 
    июль<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  июлӗсемшӗн
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  июлӗмӗрсем 
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  июлӗмӗрсен 
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  июлӗмӗрсене 
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  июлӗмӗрсенче 
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  июлӗмӗрсенчен 
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  июлӗмӗрсемпе 
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  июлӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    июль<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  июлӗмӗрсемшӗн
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  июлӗрсем 
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  июлӗрсен 
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  июлӗрсене 
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  июлӗрсенче 
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  июлӗрсенчен 
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  июлӗрсемпе 
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  июлӗрсемсӗр 
    июль<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  июлӗрсемшӗн
